North Carolina, session 2025, HB169.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. HAYWOOD COUNTY OCCUPANCY TAX CHANGES
SECTION 1.(a) Part V of Chapter 908 of the 1983 Session Laws, as amended by
Chapter 942 of the 1985 Session Laws (Regular Session 1986), Chapter 48 of the 1987 Session
Laws, Chapter 540 of the 1995 Session Laws, and S.L. 2007-337, reads as rewritten:
"Part V. Haywood Occupancy Tax.
"Sec. 10. Occupancy Tax. (a) Authorization and Scope. – The Haywood County Board of
Commissioners may levy a room occupancy and tourism development tax of two percent (2%)
up to six percent (6%) of the gross receipts derived from the rental of any room, lodging, or
similar an accommodation furnished by any hotel, motel, inn, tourist camp, or other similar place
within the county that is subject to sales tax imposed by the State under G.S. 105-164.4(a)(3).
This tax is in addition to any State or local sales tax. This tax does not apply to accommodations
furnished by nonprofit charitable, educational, benevolent, or religious organizations.
"Sec. 10.1. Additional One Percent (1%) Occupancy Tax. – In addition to the tax authorized
by Section 10 of this Part, the Haywood County Board of Commissioners may levy a room
occupancy and tourism development tax of one percent (1%) of the gross receipts derived from
the rental of accommodations taxable under that section. The levy, collection, administration,
and repeal of the tax authorized by this section, and the use of tax revenue from a tax levied under
this section, shall be in accordance with this Part. Haywood County may not levy a tax under this
section unless it also levies a tax under Section 10 of this Part.
"Sec. 10.2. Additional One Percent (1%) Occupancy Tax. – In addition to the tax authorized
by Sections 10 and 10.1 of this Part, the Haywood County Board of Commissioners may levy a
room occupancy and tourism development tax of one percent (1%) of the gross receipts derived
from the rental of accommodations taxable under Sections 10 and 10.1 of this Part. The levy,
collection, administration, and repeal of the tax authorized by this section and the use of tax
revenue from a tax levied under this section shall be in accordance with this Part. Haywood
County may not levy a tax under this section unless it also levies the tax authorized under
Sections 10 and 10.1 of this Part.
*H169-v-4*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"Sec. 12. Administration. – A tax levied under this Part shall be levied, administered,
collected, and repealed as provided in G.S. 153A-155. The penalties provided in G.S. 153A-155
apply to a tax levied under this Part.
"Sec. 13. Repealed by S.L. 2007-337.
"Sec. 14. Distribution and Use of the First Three Percent Occupancy Tax. Tax Revenue. –
Haywood County shall, on a monthly quarterly basis, remit the net proceeds of the room
occupancy and tourism development tax levied under Sections 10 and 10.1 of this Part to the
Haywood County Tourism Development Authority. The Authority shall use at least two-thirds
of the funds remitted to it under this Part to promote travel and tourism in the county and shall
use the remainder one-third of the funds for tourism-related expenditures.expenditures in the
county.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Net proceeds. – Gross proceeds less the cost to the county of administering
and collecting the tax, as determined by the finance officer, not to exceed three
percent (3%) of the first five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of gross
proceeds collected each year and one percent (1%) of the remaining gross
receipts collected each year.
(2) Promote travel and tourism. – To advertise or market an area or activity,
publish and distribute pamphlets and other materials, conduct market research,
or engage in similar promotional activities that attract tourists or business
travelers to the area. The term includes administrative expenses incurred in
engaging in the listed activities.
(3) Tourism-related expenditures. – Expenditures that, in the judgment of the
Tourism Development Authority, are designed to increase the use of lodging
facilities, meeting facilities, or convention facilities in a county or to attract
tourists or business travelers to the county. The term includes tourism-related
capital expenditures.
"Sec. 14.1. Distribution and Use of the Additional One Percent Occupancy Tax. – Haywood
County shall, on a monthly basis, remit the net proceeds of the room occupancy and tourism
development tax levied under Section 10.2 of this Part to the Haywood County Tourism
Development Authority. The Authority must segregate the net proceeds received under this
section into five separate accounts based on the collection area from which the proceeds were
collected. Net proceeds collected under this section from accommodations located in the 28716
zip code area must be credited to the Canton Area Account. Net proceeds collected under this
section from accommodations located in the 28721 zip code area must be credited to the Clyde
Area Account. Net proceeds collected under this section from accommodations located in 28745
zip code area must be credited to the Lake Junaluska Area Account. Net proceeds collected under
this section from accommodations located in the 28751 zip code area must be credited to the
Maggie Valley Area Account. Net proceeds collected under this section from accommodations
located in the 28785 and the 28786 zip code areas must be credited to the Waynesville Area
Account. Based on recommendations from and in consultation with each of the five collection
areas, the Authority shall use at least two-thirds of the funds in each account to promote travel
and tourism and the remainder for tourist-related expenditures in each of the collection areas.
"Sec. 15. Tourism Development Authority. – (a) Appointment and Membership. – When the
Haywood County Board of Commissioners adopts a resolution levying a room occupancy and
tourism development tax pursuant to this Part, it shall also adopt a resolution creating the
Haywood County Tourism Development Authority, which shall be a public authority under the
Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act. The resolution shall provide that the Authority
is composed of the following 15 eight members:
(1) Three Two members who own or operate hotels, motels, or other
accommodations with more than 20 rental units. Of these members, one
Page 2 House Bill 169-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
member must be from the 28751, 28785, or 28786 zip code, and one member
must be from the 28716, 28721, or 28745 zip code.
(2) Three Two members who own or operate hotels, motels, or other
accommodations with 20 or fewer rental units. Of these members, one
member must be from the 28751, 28785, or 28786 zip code, and one member
must be from the 28716, 28721, or 28745 zip code.
(3) Two members who own or operate a tourism-related business, including, but
not limited to, county attractions, resorts, restaurants, gift shops, and concert
venues. Of these members, one member must be from the 28751, 28785, or
28786 zip code, and one member must be from the 28716, 28721, or 28745
zip code.
(4) Four at-large members who are recommended to the Board of Commissioners
by the four municipal governments. Each governing body must submit two
names to the Board, and the Board must select from the names submitted.
(5)(4) Three ex officio, nonvoting members as follows:
a.A member of the Haywood County Board of Commissioners.
(5) b.The One ex officio, nonvoting member, who shall be the Haywood County
finance officer.
c. The Executive Director of the Haywood County Economic
Development Commission.
All members of the Authority shall be appointed by the Haywood County Board of
Commissioners. The resolution shall also provide for the members' terms of office and for the
filling of vacancies on the Authority. At least one-third of the members must be individuals
affiliated with businesses that collect the tax in the county, and at least one-half of the members
must be individuals currently active in the promotion of travel and tourism in the county. The
Board of Commissioners shall designate four of its initial appointees to serve a one-year term,
four to serve a two-year term, and four to serve a three-year term. Thereafter, all members shall
serve three-year terms. All members of the Authority serve at the pleasure of the Board of
Commissioners and may be removed by the Board at any time. All members of the Authority
shall serve without compensation. Vacancies shall be filled by the Board of Commissioners
subject to the qualifications established above for the vacating member. Members appointed to
fill vacancies shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term for which they are appointed to fill.
The Board shall designate one member of the Authority as chair and shall determine the
compensation, if any, to be paid to members of the Authority.
The members of the Tourism Development Authority shall elect from its membership a chair.
The Authority shall meet at the call of the chair and shall adopt rules of procedure to govern its
meetings. The chair shall only vote to break a tie vote. The finance officer of Haywood County
shall serve be the ex officio as accountant for finance officer of the Authority.
(b1) Duties. – The Authority shall expend the net proceeds of the tax levied under this Part
for the purposes provided in this Part. The Authority shall promote travel, tourism, and
conventions in the county, sponsor tourist-related events and activities in the county, and finance
tourist-related capital projects in the county.promoting travel and tourism and for tourism-related
expenditures as provided in this Part.
(c) Reports. – The Authority shall report quarterly and at the close of the fiscal year to
the Board of Commissioners on its receipts and disbursements for the preceding quarter and for
the year in such detail as the Board may require."
SECTION 1.(b) This Part is effective when it becomes law. When the Haywood
County Board of Commissioners adopts a resolution levying an increase of the room occupancy
tax as authorized under this Part, it shall adopt a resolution modifying the composition of the
Haywood County Tourism Development Authority in accordance with this Part.

House Bill 169-Fourth Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART II. CHEROKEE COUNTY TDA CHANGES
SECTION 2.(a) Section 6 of Chapter 1055 of the 1983 Session Laws, as amended
by Section 21(e) of S.L. 2007-527, Section 1 of S.L. 2008-33, and Section 28 of S.L. 2009-445,
reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 6. Cherokee County Tourism Development Authority. –
(a) Appointment and Membership. – When the Cherokee County Board of
Commissioners adopts a resolution levying a room occupancy tax under this act, it shall also
adopt a resolution creating a County Tourism Development Authority, which shall be a public
authority under the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act. The resolution shall
provide for the membership of the Authority, including the members' terms of office, in
accordance with this section, and for the filling of vacancies on the Authority. At least one-third
of the members must be individuals who are affiliated with businesses that collect the tax in the
county, and at least one-half of the members must be individuals who are currently active in the
promotion of travel and tourism in the county. Members of the Authority shall serve for terms of
three years, and no member shall serve more than two consecutive full terms unless a minimum
of 12 months has elapsed since the expiration of the member's second full term. The board of
commissioners shall designate one member of the Authority as chair and shall determine the
compensation, if any, to be paid to members of the Authority. The Authority shall meet at the
call of the chair and shall adopt rules of procedure to govern its meetings. The Finance Officer
for Cherokee County shall be the ex officio finance officer of the Authority. The Authority shall
be composed of seven members as follows:
(1) One member of the Cherokee County Board of Commissioners, appointed by
the Cherokee County Board of Commissioners.
(2) One member, nominated by the Town Council of the Town of Murphy, who
is actively engaged in the promotion of travel and tourism or the collection of
occupancy tax. The Cherokee County Board of Commissioners shall appoint
the Town Council's nominee under this subdivision.
(3) One member, nominated by the Board of Aldermen of the Town of Andrews,
who is actively engaged in the promotion of travel and tourism or collects
occupancy tax. The Cherokee County Board of Commissioners shall appoint
the Board of Aldermen's nominee under this subdivision.
(4) Four members who are actively engaged in the promotion of travel and
tourism or collect the occupancy tax. The Cherokee County Board of
Commissioners shall appoint the four members under this subdivision.
(b) Duties. – The Authority shall expend the net proceeds of the tax levied under this act
for the purposes provided in this act. The Authority shall promote travel, tourism, and
conventions in the county, sponsor tourist-related events and activities in the county, and finance
tourist-related capital projects in the county.
(c) Reports. – The Authority shall report quarterly and at the close of the fiscal year to
the board of county commissioners on its receipts and disbursements for the preceding quarter
and for the year in such detail as the board may require."
SECTION 2.(b) The modifications to appointments and term limits of members of
the Cherokee County Tourism Development Authority under this Part become incrementally
effective upon the expiration of the terms of current members of the Authority and applicable to
newly seated members of the Authority thereafter.

PART III. TOWN OF LELAND OCCUPANCY TAX CHANGES
SECTION 3.(a) Section 1.1 of S.L. 2008-64 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.1. Occupancy tax. – (a) Authorization and Scope. – The Town Council of the
Town of Leland may levy a room occupancy tax of up to three percent (3%) of the gross receipts
derived from the rental of any room, lodging, or an accommodation furnished by a hotel, motel,
Page 4 House Bill 169-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
inn, tourist camp, or similar place within the town that is subject to sales tax imposed by the State
under G.S. 105-164.4(a)(3). This tax is in addition to any State or local sales tax. This tax does
not apply to accommodations furnished by nonprofit charitable, educational, or religious
organizations when furnished in furtherance of their nonprofit purpose.
"SECTION 1.1.(b) Administration. – A tax levied under this section shall be levied,
administered, collected, and repealed as provided in G.S. 160A-215. The penalties provided in
G.S. 160A-215 apply to a tax levied under this section.
"SECTION 1.1.(c) Distribution and Use of Tax Revenue. – The Town of Leland shall, on a
quarterly basis, remit the net proceeds of the occupancy tax to the Leland Tourism Development
Authority. The Authority shall use at least two-thirds of the funds remitted to it under this
subsection to promote travel and tourism in the Town of Leland and shall use the remainder for
tourism-related expenditures.
The following definitions apply in this subsection:
(1) Net proceeds. – Gross proceeds less the cost to the town of administering and
collecting the tax, as determined by the finance officer, not to exceed three
percent (3%) of the first five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of gross
proceeds collected each year and one percent (1%) of the remaining gross
proceeds collected each year.
(2) Promote travel and tourism. – To advertise or market an area or activity,
publish and distribute pamphlets and other materials, conduct market research,
or engage in similar promotional activities that attract tourists or business
travelers to the area; the term includes administrative expenses incurred in
engaging in the listed activities.
(3) Tourism-related expenditures. – Expenditures that, in the judgment of the
Leland Tourism Development Authority, are designed to increase the use of
lodging facilities, meeting facilities, or convention facilities in the town or to
attract tourists or business travelers to the town. The term includes
tourism-related capital expenditures.expenditures, seasonal ocean rescue and
lifeguard services, and police and fire overtime pay for festivals and special
events that are funded by occupancy tax proceeds."
SECTION 3.(b) This Part is effective when it becomes law and applies to the
expenditure of occupancy tax proceeds collected on or after that date.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 169-Fourth Edition Page 5